Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-603
Formal grievance process for families
involved in child welfare system or juvenile justice system; duties; report.

The Department
of Health and Human Services shall implement a formal grievance process for
families involved in the child welfare system or juvenile justice system.
Such grievance process shall ensure that families are not dissuaded from utilizing
the grievance process for fear of reprisal from the department, providers,
or foster parents. A report of each grievance allegation and the determination
of and any action to be taken by the department shall be provided to the Inspector
General for Nebraska Child Welfare within ten days after such determination
is made.

Laws 2013, LB269, § 11.